Hawaii statutes.
[§201-72.6] Hawaii unmanned aerial
systems test site advisory board; established. (a) There is established a
Hawaii unmanned aerial systems test site advisory board, as a subcommittee of
the Hawaii aerospace advisory committee, to oversee the planning and operation
of the Hawaii unmanned aerial systems test site.

(b) The board shall be composed of seven
members as follows:

(1) The adjutant general, or the adjutant general's
designee;

(2) The director of transportation, or the director's
designee;

(3) The director of business, economic development,
and tourism, or the director's designee;

(4) The president of the University of Hawaii, or the
president's designee;

(5) One member representing the Hawaii business
community, to be appointed by the governor pursuant to section 26-34; and

(6) Two members representing the aerospace or
aviation industries, to be appointed by the governor pursuant to section 26-34.

Each board member shall serve for a term of
four years; provided that the initial terms shall be staggered, as determined
by the governor.

(c) Members of the board shall not receive
compensation for their services but shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses,
including travel expenses, incurred in the performance of their duties under
this section. [L 2015, c 208, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next